New York, session 2025-2026, A8151.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Clause (C) of subparagraph (i) and clause (D) of subpara- 2 graph (ii) of paragraph (l) of subdivision 12 of section 66 of the 3 public service law, as added by chapter 333 of the laws of 2024, are 4 amended to read as follows: 5 (C) the average proposed rate change, including the respective changes 6 to service and delivery charges, for a residential, commercial, and 7 industrial ratepayer, including yearly or sliding scale breakdown if 8 applicable; 9 (D) the average rate change, including the respective changes to 10 service and delivery charges, for a residential, commercial, and indus- 11 trial ratepayer, including yearly or sliding scale breakdown if applica- 12 ble; 13 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 14 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11895-01-5